Utah statutes.
58-16a-906.   Penalties for violations.

(1)  Knowingly and intentionally violating Section 58-16a-904 is a class A misdemeanor.

(2)  The attorney general may bring a civil action or seek an injunction and a civil penalty against a person, entity, or manufacturer who violates Section 58-16a-904.

